Maryland, session 2026, HB1235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–103.
(a) (1) Whenever procurement is based on competitive sealed bids, a
procurement officer shall seek bids by issuing an invitation for bids.
(2) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, an invitation for bids shall
include:
(i) the specifications of the procurement contract, including the
expected degree of minority business enterprise participation, as provided in § 14–303(b) of
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1235*

HOUSE BILL 1235
this article;
(ii) a summary of the factors used to determine the expected degree
of minority business enterprise participation for the procurement contract, including
subcontracting opportunities identified for the project, any applicable North American
Industry Classification System codes linked to the subcontracting opportunities, and the
number of certified minority business enterprises in those industries;
(iii) [whether the procurement contract will be awarded based on the
lowest bid price, the lowest evaluated bid price or, if the procurement is subject to §
11–202(3) of this article,] THE STANDARDIZED EVALUATION CRITERIA UNDER
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION FOR DETERMINING the bid most favorable to the
State; AND
(iv) [if the procurement contract will be based on evaluated bid price,
the objective measurable criteria by which the lowest evaluated bid price will be
determined; and
(v)] if the head of the unit or the head of the unit’s designee has so
designated, the small business preference.
(b) (1) Whenever a procurement officer determines that an initial preparation
of specifications for price bids is impracticable, the invitation for bids may:
(i) include a request for unpriced technical offers or samples; and
(ii) direct bidders to submit price bids:
1. with the unpriced technical offers or samples; or
2. after the unit evaluates the technical offers or samples and
finds that they are acceptable under the criteria set forth in the invitation for bids.
(2) A unit shall consider the prices submitted by bidders whose technical
offers or samples have been found acceptable.
(3) Price bids may not be opened until after the unit has completed
evaluation of the technical offers or samples.
(4) (i) A price bid may not be opened at any time if the bid is submitted
by a bidder whose technical offer or sample has been evaluated as unacceptable to the unit.
(ii) A procurement officer shall return an unopened price bid
submitted by a bidder whose technical offer or sample has been evaluated as unacceptable.

HOUSE BILL 1235 3
(c) (1) A unit shall give public notice of an invitation for bids before bid
opening in accordance with this subsection.
(2) A unit shall give reasonable notice that shall be at least 10 days before
bid opening.
(3) The unit shall publish notice in eMaryland Marketplace at least 20 days
before bid opening if:
(i) the procurement officer reasonably expects bid prices to exceed
the small procurement amount specified in § 13–109 of this subtitle or a lower amount set
by the Board by regulation in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State Government
Article; and
(ii) at least part of the procurement contract is to be performed in
this State or the District of Columbia.
(4) In addition to any notice required under this subsection, a unit may
publish notice of an invitation for bids:
(i) on a bid board or eMaryland Marketplace; or
(ii) in a newspaper, periodical, or trade journal.
(d) (1) A procurement officer shall:
(i) open bids in public at the time and place designated in the
invitation for bids; and
(ii) announce, record, and post:
1. the name of each bidder; and
2. the amount of each bid.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, a bid is
irrevocable, after bid opening, for the period specified in the invitation for bids.
(3) A procurement officer may allow a bidder to correct or withdraw a bid
if correction or withdrawal is:
(i) allowed under regulations adopted under this Division II; and
(ii) approved in writing by the Office of the Attorney General.

HOUSE BILL 1235
(e) (1) After obtaining any approval required by law, the procurement officer
shall award the procurement contract to the responsible bidder who submits the responsive
bid that[:
(i) is the lowest bid price;
(ii) if the invitation for bids so provides, is the lowest evaluated bid
price; or
(iii) for procurement subject to § 11–202(3) of this article,] is the bid
most favorable to the State UNDER THE STANDARDIZED EVALUATION CRITERIA
UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) If, after competitive sealed bids have been opened, a procurement
officer determines that only 1 responsible bidder has submitted a responsive bid, the unit
may negotiate the procurement contract with that 1 bidder under the procedure for sole
source procurement.
(3) (i) After competitive sealed bids have been opened, a procurement
officer may award a procurement contract on the basis of revised bids if:
1. all bids are rejected under § 13–206(b) of this title;
2. all bid prices exceed the funds available for the
procurement; or
3. with the approval of the head of the unit or a designee, the
procurement officer determines that all bids are unreasonable as to at least 1 requirement
and the delay that would result from issuing a new invitation for bids with revised
specifications or quantities would be fiscally disadvantageous or otherwise not in the best
interests of the State.
(ii) If there is more than 1 bidder, discussions about revised
specifications or quantities shall be conducted with all responsible bidders who submitted
responsive bids. The bidders shall be treated fairly and equally with respect to any
discussions.
(iii) As promptly as possible, the procurement officer shall:
1. issue an invitation for revised bids, which shall state
whether the award will be made without competitive negotiations; and
2. require a prompt response to that invitation.
(iv) An invitation for revised bids is not subject to the notice
requirements in subsection (c) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1235 5
(v) After revised bids have been submitted, negotiations with
bidders may not be conducted unless the procurement officer determines that there is a
compelling reason to negotiate.
(vi) After revised bids have been opened and any approval required
by law has been obtained, the procurement officer shall award the procurement contract to
the responsible bidder who submits a responsive bid [that:
1. is the lowest bid price;
2. if the invitation for revised bids so provides, is the lowest
evaluated bid price; or
3. for procurement subject to § 11–202(3) of this article,]
THAT is the bid most favorable to the State UNDER THE STANDARDIZED EVALUATION
CRITERIA UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) A responsive bid or proposal shall include:
(I) the criteria specified in subsection (a) of this section; AND
(II) A STATEMENT OF THE STATE AND LOCAL ECONOMIC
IMPACT OF THE BID, INCLUDING:
1. THE PERCENTAGE OF STATE–BASED EMPLOYEES
WHO WILL PERFORM THE CONTRACT;
2. THE ANTICIPATED STATE–BASED SUBCONTRACTORS
THAT WILL BE UTILIZED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT;
3. THE ESTIMATED STATE AND LOCAL TAXES THAT WILL
BE GENERATED FROM THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT;
4. THE NUMBER OF JOBS THAT WILL BE CREATED OR
RETAINED IN THE STATE FROM THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT; AND
5. ANY LOCATION WHERE THE CONTRACT WILL BE
PERFORMED.
(f) Not more than 30 days after the execution and approval of a procurement
contract in excess of the small procurement amount specified in § 13–109 of this subtitle
awarded under this section, or a lower amount set by the Board by regulation in accordance
with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article, a unit shall publish notice of the
award in eMaryland Marketplace.

HOUSE BILL 1235
(G) (1) FOR ANY PROCUREMENT CONTRACT AWARDED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION, A UNIT SHALL EVALUATE PROPOSALS USING THE
STANDARDIZED CRITERIA UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW, A BID
SHALL BE EVALUATED ON A SCALE OF 100 POINTS.
(II) A MAXIMUM OF 40 POINTS MAY BE AWARDED FOR THE
TECHNICAL MERIT OF THE BID, INCLUDING:
1. THE QUALITY OF THE PROPOSED METHODS OF
PERFORMING THE CONTRACT;
2. THE TECHNICAL CAPABILITY OF THE BIDDER;
3. THE STAFFING AND QUALIFICATIONS OF THE BIDDER;
AND
4. THE BIDDER’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE SCOPE AND
SPECIFICATIONS INCLUDED IN THE INVITATION FOR BIDS.
(III) A MAXIMUM OF 30 POINTS MAY BE AWARDED FOR THE
STATE AND LOCAL ECONOMIC IMPACT OF THE BID, INCLUDING:
1. THE BIDDER HAVING ITS PRINCIPAL PLACE OF
BUSINESS IN THE STATE;
2. THE PERCENTAGE OF THE BIDDER’S WORKFORCE
EMPLOYED IN THE STATE;
3. THE USE OF STATE–BASED SUBCONTRACTORS;
4. THE EXPECTED STATE AND LOCAL TAXES THAT WILL
BE GENERATED FROM PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT; AND
5. THE AMOUNT OF THE BIDDER’S CAPITAL INVESTMENT
AND REINVESTMENT IN THE STATE.
(IV) A MAXIMUM OF 20 POINTS MAY BE AWARDED FOR THE
TOTAL COST TO THE UNIT UNDER THE BID.
(V) A MAXIMUM OF 10 POINTS MAY BE AWARDED FOR:

HOUSE BILL 1235 7
1. PRIOR PERFORMANCE OF CONTRACTS WITH THE
STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTS BY THE BIDDER; AND
2. THE TIMELINESS, QUALITY OF WORK PERFORMED,
AND COMPLIANCE HISTORY OF THE BIDDER ON ANY PRIOR CONTRACTS WITH THE
STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTS.
13–104.
(a) Competitive sealed proposals is the preferred method for:
(1) human, social, cultural, or educational services; and
(2) security services with an expected value that is greater than
$1,000,000.
(b) (1) Whenever procurement is based on competitive sealed proposals, a
procurement officer shall seek proposals by issuing a request for proposals.
(2) A request for proposals shall include a statement of:
(i) the scope of the procurement contract, including the expected
degree of minority business enterprise participation, as provided in § 14–303(b) of this
article;
(ii) a summary of the factors used to determine the expected degree
of minority business enterprise participation for the procurement contract, including
subcontracting opportunities identified for the project, any applicable North American
Industry Classification System codes linked to the subcontracting opportunities, and the
number of certified minority business enterprises in those industries; AND
(iii) the factors[, including price,] UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS
SECTION that will be used in evaluating proposals[; and
(iv) the relative importance of each factor].
(c) A unit shall publish a request for proposals in the same manner as required
for an invitation for bids.
(d) (1) After receipt of proposals but before the procurement officer awards the
procurement contract, a unit may conduct discussions with an offeror to:
(i) obtain the best price for the State; and
(ii) ensure full understanding of:

HOUSE BILL 1235
1. the requirements of the State, as set forth in the request
for proposals; and
2. the proposal submitted by the offeror.
(2) If discussions are conducted, the unit:
(i) shall conduct the discussions in accordance with regulations
adopted under this Division II;
(ii) shall provide an opportunity to participate to each responsible
offeror who submits a proposal that, in the judgment of the procurement officer, is
reasonably susceptible of being selected for award;
(iii) shall treat all of those responsible offerors fairly and equally;
(iv) may allow all of those responsible offerors to revise their initial
proposals by submitting best and final offers, if discussions indicate that it would be in the
best interests of the State to do so;
(v) may conduct more than 1 series of discussions and requests for
best and final offers; and
(vi) may not disclose to an offeror any information derived from a
proposal of or discussions with a competing offeror.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, an
oral presentation is required when:
1. the total value of the contract is expected to exceed
$2,000,000 for architectural and engineering services;
2. the total value of the contract is expected to exceed
$10,000,000 for construction and construction related services; or
3. for any other procurement, including information
technology and professional services, the total value of the contract is expected to exceed
$5,000,000.
(ii) If the procurement officer makes a written determination that
oral presentations are unlikely to aid in the evaluation process, oral presentations are not
required.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection:
(i) a proposal is irrevocable for the period specified in the request
for proposals; and

HOUSE BILL 1235 9
(ii) a best and final offer is irrevocable for the period specified in the
request for best and final offers.
(2) A procurement officer may allow an offeror to correct or withdraw a
proposal or best and final offer if correction or withdrawal is:
(i) allowed under regulations adopted under this Division II; and
(ii) approved in writing by the Office of the Attorney General.
(f) (1) After obtaining any approval required by law, the procurement officer
shall award the procurement contract to the responsible offeror who submits the proposal
or best and final offer determined to be the most advantageous to the State considering the
evaluation factors [set forth in the request for proposals] UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) A PROPOSAL SHALL INCLUDE A STATEMENT OF THE STATE AND
LOCAL ECONOMIC IMPACT OF THE BID, INCLUDING:
(I) THE PERCENTAGE OF STATE–BASED EMPLOYEES WHO WILL
PERFORM THE CONTRACT;
(II) THE ANTICIPATED STATE–BASED SUBCONTRACTORS THAT
WILL BE UTILIZED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT;
(III) THE ESTIMATED STATE AND LOCAL TAXES THAT WILL BE
GENERATED FROM THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT;
(IV) THE NUMBER OF JOBS THAT WILL BE CREATED OR
RETAINED IN THE STATE FROM THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT; AND
(V) ANY LOCATION WHERE THE CONTRACT WILL BE
PERFORMED.
(g) A unit shall publish notice of a contract in excess of the small procurement
amount specified in § 13–109 of this subtitle awarded under this section, or a lower amount
set by the Board by regulation in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State
Government Article in eMaryland Marketplace.
(H) (1) FOR ANY PROCUREMENT CONTRACT AWARDED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION, A UNIT SHALL EVALUATE PROPOSALS USING THE
STANDARDIZED CRITERIA UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1235
(2) (I) UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW, A
PROPOSAL SHALL BE EVALUATED ON A SCALE OF 100 POINTS.
(II) A MAXIMUM OF 40 POINTS MAY BE AWARDED FOR THE
TECHNICAL MERIT OF THE PROPOSAL, INCLUDING:
1. THE QUALITY OF THE PROPOSED METHODS OF
PERFORMING THE CONTRACT;
2. THE TECHNICAL CAPABILITY OF THE OFFEROR;
3. THE STAFFING AND QUALIFICATIONS OF THE
OFFEROR; AND
4. THE PROPOSAL’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE SCOPE AND
SPECIFICATIONS INCLUDED IN THE REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS.
(III) A MAXIMUM OF 30 POINTS MAY BE AWARDED FOR THE
STATE AND LOCAL ECONOMIC IMPACT OF THE PROPOSAL, INCLUDING:
1. THE OFFEROR HAVING ITS PRINCIPAL PLACE OF
BUSINESS IN THE STATE;
2. THE PERCENTAGE OF THE OFFEROR’S WORKFORCE
EMPLOYED IN THE STATE;
3. THE USE OF STATE–BASED SUBCONTRACTORS;
4. THE EXPECTED STATE AND LOCAL TAXES THAT WILL
BE GENERATED FROM PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT; AND
5. THE AMOUNT OF THE OFFEROR’S CAPITAL
INVESTMENT AND REINVESTMENT IN THE STATE.
(IV) A MAXIMUM OF 20 POINTS MAY BE AWARDED FOR THE
TOTAL COST TO THE UNIT UNDER THE PROPOSAL.
(V) A MAXIMUM OF 10 POINTS MAY BE AWARDED FOR:
1. PRIOR PERFORMANCE OF CONTRACTS WITH THE
STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTS BY THE OFFEROR; AND

HOUSE BILL 1235 11
2. THE TIMELINESS, QUALITY OF WORK PERFORMED,
AND COMPLIANCE HISTORY OF THE OFFEROR ON ANY PRIOR CONTRACTS WITH THE
STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.